Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.060

Unauthorized functions to be performed under other law.

All functions of local government which are not authorized as provided in this chapter to be performed by a metropolitan municipal corporation, shall continue to be performed by the counties, cities and special districts within the metropolitan area as provided by law.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.060. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 6.]